Florida, session 2026, SB640.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âParagraph (h) of subsection (1) of section 16 121.055, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 17 121.055âSenior Management Service Class.âThere is hereby 18 established a separate class of membership within the Florida 19 Retirement System to be known as the âSenior Management Service 20 Class,â which shall become effective February 1, 1987. 21 (1) 22 (h)1.a.âExcept as provided in subparagraph 3., effective 23 January 1, 1994, participation in the Senior Management Service 24 Class shall be compulsory for the State Courts Administrator and 25 the Deputy State Courts Administrators, the Clerk of the Supreme 26 Court, the Marshal of the Supreme Court, the Executive Director 27 of the Justice Administrative Commission, the capital collateral 28 regional counsel, the clerks of the district courts of appeals, 29 the marshals of the district courts of appeals, and the trial 30 court administrator and the Chief Deputy Court Administrator in 31 each judicial circuit. Effective July 1, 2026, participation in 32 the Senior Management Service Class shall be compulsory for up 33 to an additional 235 nonjudicial managerial or policymaking 34 positions within the judicial branch, as selected by the Chief 35 Justice of the Supreme Court. 36 b.âEffective July 1, 2026, participation in the Senior 37 Management Service Class shall be compulsory for the Executive 38 Director and the General Counsel of the Florida Judicial 39 Qualifications Commission. 40 c.âEffective January 1, 1994, additional positions in the 41 offices of the state attorney and public defender in each 42 judicial circuit may be designated for inclusion in the Senior 43 Management Service Class of the Florida Retirement System, 44 provided that: 45 (I)a.âPositions to be included in the class shall be 46 designated by the state attorney or public defender, as 47 appropriate. Notice of intent to designate positions for 48 inclusion in the class shall be published for at least 2 49 consecutive weeks on a publicly accessible website as provided 50 in s. 50.0311 or, if published in print, once a week for 2 51 consecutive weeks in a newspaper qualified under chapter 50 in 52 the county or counties affected. 53 (II)b.âOne nonelective full-time position may be designated 54 for each state attorney and public defender reporting to the 55 Department of Management Services; for agencies with 200 or more 56 regularly established positions under the state attorney or 57 public defender, additional nonelective full-time positions may 58 be designated, not to exceed 0.5 percent of the regularly 59 established positions within the agency. 60 (III)c.âEach position added to the class must be a 61 managerial or policymaking position filled by an employee who 62 serves at the pleasure of the state attorney or public defender 63 without civil service protection, and who: 64 (A)(I)âHeads an organizational unit; or 65 (B)(II)âHas responsibility to effect or recommend 66 personnel, budget, expenditure, or policy decisions in his or 67 her areas of responsibility. 68 2.âParticipation in this class shall be compulsory, except 69 as provided in subparagraph 3., for any judicial employee who 70 holds a position designated for coverage in the Senior 71 Management Service Class, and such participation shall continue 72 until the employee terminates employment in a covered position. 73 Effective January 1, 2001, participation in this class is 74 compulsory for assistant state attorneys, assistant statewide 75 prosecutors, assistant public defenders, and assistant capital 76 collateral regional counsel. Effective January 1, 2002, 77 participation in this class is compulsory for assistant 78 attorneys general. 79 3.âIn lieu of participation in the Senior Management 80 Service Class, such members, excluding assistant state 81 attorneys, assistant public defenders, assistant statewide 82 prosecutors, assistant attorneys general, and assistant capital 83 collateral regional counsel, may participate in the Senior 84 Management Service Optional Annuity Program as established in 85 subsection (6). 86 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.